Washington statutes.
RCW 36.29.170

Office at county seat.

The county treasurer shall keep an office at the county seat, and shall keep the same open for transaction of business during business hours; and the treasurer and the treasurer's deputy are authorized to administer all oaths necessary in the discharge of the duties of the office.

[ 2009 c 105 s 4; 2001 c 299 s 9; 1963 c 4 s 36.29.170. Prior: Code 1881 s 2742; 1863 p 553 s 5; 1854 p 427 s 5; RRS s 4110.]